Kentucky statutes. TITLE XII Conservation and State Development
Kentucky Environmental Stewardship Act

154.48-010.
Definitions for KRS 154.010 to 154.48-035. [Repealed]

History.
Enact. Acts 2005, ch. 168, § 143, effective March 18, 2005; 2006, ch. 149, § 222, effective July 12, 2006; 2006, ch. 211, § 78, effective July 12, 2006; 2006 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 2, § 64, effective June 28, 2006; 2009, ch. 11, § 45, effective June 25, 2009; 2010, ch. 24, § 207, effective July 15, 2010; Repealed, Acts 2018, ch. 171, § 140, effective April 14, 2018; Repealed, Acts 2018, ch. 207, § 148, effective April 27, 2018; Repealed, Acts 2018, ch. 199, § 37, effective July 14, 2018.

154.48-015.
Findings of General Assembly regarding provisions of KRS 154.48-010 to 154.48-035. [Repealed]

HISTORY:
Enact. Acts 2005, ch. 168, § 144, effective March 18, 2005; Repealed, Acts 2018, ch. 171, § 140, effective April 14, 2018; Repealed, Acts 2018, ch. 207, § 148, effective April 27, 2018; Repealed, Acts 2018, ch. 199, § 37, effective July 14, 2018.

154.48-020.
Administrative regulations establishing standards for preliminary approval of eligible companies and projects — Review by authority and final approval of companies and projects — Authority’s meetings to be governed by provisions of Open Meetings Act. [Repealed]

History.
Enact. Acts 2005, ch. 168, § 145, effective March 18, 2005; 2007, ch. 69, § 6, effective June 26, 2007; Repealed, Acts 2018, ch. 171, § 140, effective April 14, 2018; Repealed, Acts 2018, ch. 207, § 148, effective April 27, 2018; Repealed, Acts 2018, ch. 199, § 37, effective July 14, 2018.

154.48-025.
Environmental stewardship agreements — Final approval of application — Tax credits — Sum of total inducements — Limitation on use of recycling credit — Consent of authority required for transfer of agreement. [Repealed]

History.
Enact. Acts 2005, ch. 168, § 146, effective March 18, 2005; 2006 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 2, § 65, effective June 28, 2006; Repealed, Acts 2018, ch. 171, § 140, effective April 14, 2018; Repealed, Acts 2018, ch. 207, § 148, effective April 27, 2018; Repealed, Acts 2018, ch. 199, § 37, effective July 14, 2018.

154.48-030.
Department to make annual report on income tax credits and returns to authority. [Repealed]

History.
Enact. Acts 2005, ch. 168, § 147, effective March 18, 2005; 2006 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 2, § 66, effective June 28, 2006; Repealed, Acts 2018, ch. 171, § 140, effective April 14, 2018; Repealed, Acts 2018, ch. 207, § 148, effective April 27, 2018; Repealed, Acts 2018, ch. 199, § 37, effective July 14, 2018.

154.48-035.
Short title for KRS 154.48-010 to 154.48-035 — Kentucky Environmental Stewardship Act. [Repealed]

History.
Enact. Acts 2005, ch. 168, § 148, effective March 18, 2005; Repealed, Acts 2018, ch. 171, § 140, effective April 14, 2018; Repealed, Acts 2018, ch. 207, § 148, effective April 27, 2018; Repealed, Acts 2018, ch. 199, § 37, effective July 14, 2018.